Utah statutes.
63K-2-204.   Proclamation of emergency -- Effective period -- Extension of
renewal by Legislature.
(1) (a)  The governor may issue a proclamation declaring that a state of
emergency exists with regard to one or more energy resources if the governor
determines that an existing or imminent severe disruption or impending
shortage in the supply of one or more energy resources, in this state or
elsewhere:
(i)  threatens:
(A)  the availability of essential services or transportation; or
(B)  the operation of the economy; and
(ii)  because of the threats described in Subsection (1)(a)(i), jeopardizes
the peace, health, safety, and welfare of the people of this state.
(b)  The proclamation declaring a state of emergency described in Subsection
(1)(a) shall state with specificity the nature of the disruption or shortage
in an energy resource.
(c) (i)  Within seven calendar days of the day on which the governor issues a
proclamation declaring a state of emergency under this section, the
Legislative Management Committee shall:
(A)  review the proclamation; and
(B)  advise the governor on the proclamation.
(ii)  The failure of the Legislative Management Committee to meet as required
by Subsection (1)(c)(i) does not affect the validity of the proclamation
declaring a state of emergency.
(2) (a)  A proclamation issued under this section, and any order or rule
issued as a result of the proclamation shall continue in effect until 60 days
from the date of the proclamation of the state of emergency unless the
governor rescinds the proclamation and declares the emergency ended prior to
the expiration of this 60-day period.
(b)  A proclamation issued within 30 days of the expiration of a prior
proclamation for the same emergency shall be considered a renewal or extension
subject to Subsection (3).
(3)  A proclamation may be renewed or extended only by joint resolution of the
Legislature.
